Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5567.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6-13.1-28 of the General Laws in Chapter 6-13.1 entitled "Deceptive
Trade Practices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
6-13.1-28. Financing of motor vehicles — Term and rate of interest prominently
displayed.
(a) Any contract to finance the sale of a motor vehicle shall prominently display the term
and rate of interest.
(b) The borrower’s initials or signature shall appear immediately adjacent to the term and
to the rate of interest on the loan agreement that shall only serve as an acknowledgement that the
borrower has been informed of the terms and rate. The borrower shall also be required to separately
sign the loan agreement to bind himself or herself to the contract.
(c) No contract to finance the lease of a motor vehicle shall use the term "down payment",
"money down", or any similar language to describe lump sum payments made at the time of
financing to reduce monthly lease payments. The lessee shall be provided and required to
acknowledge a plain language disclosure in at least eleven (11) point font that any lump sum money
paid at the time of financing will not be returned if the vehicle is involved in an incident and
determined to be a total loss, regardless of the circumstances.
(c)(d) Any agreement to finance a motor vehicle that does not comply with the provision
of this section shall be voidable within thirty (30) days at the option of the borrower; provided,

however, the borrower shall be responsible for any damage to the vehicle.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001497
========
LC001497 - Page 2 of 3